Massachusetts, session 194th, H4690.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the most recent edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following new section:
Temporary Moratorium on Lithium Battery Storage Facility Siting.
(a) Definitions- As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:
"Battery storage facility"- a facility that uses lithium-based batteries to store and
distribute electrical energy.
"State permitting authority"- any state agency responsible for granting permits related to
energy infrastructure, including but not limited to the Department of Public Utilities and the
Energy Facilities Siting Board.
of 3

"Study commission"- a panel of experts established under subsection (c) to assess the
risks and regulatory needs of lithium battery storage facilities.
(b) Establishment of Moratorium- (1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, no new permits shall be issued for the construction or operation of lithium battery
storage facilities within the Commonwealth for a period of 18 months from the effective date of
this act. (2) Facilities that have already received final approval prior to the effective date of this
act may proceed with construction and operation, provided they comply with all applicable
safety and environmental regulations.
(c) Study Commission on Lithium Battery Storage Risks-
(1) A study commission shall be established to assess the environmental, public health,
and safety risks associated with lithium battery storage facilities.
(2) The commission shall consist of: (A) The Secretary of Energy and Environmental
Affairs, or a designee, who shall serve as chair; (B) The State Fire Marshal, or a designee; (C)
The Commissioner of the Department of Environmental Protection, or a designee; (D) Two
representatives from municipal governments, appointed by the Governor; (E) A representative of
an environmental advocacy organization, appointed by the Attorney General; (F) A fire safety
expert with experience in battery storage, appointed by the Speaker of the House; (G) An energy
industry representative with expertise in grid storage, appointed by the Senate President.
(3) The commission shall: (A) Conduct a comprehensive review of fire hazards,
contamination risks, and emergency response challenges associated with lithium battery storage
facilities; (B) Assess the adequacy of existing federal, state, and local regulations; (C)
of 3

Recommend regulatory and legislative actions necessary to ensure safe siting and operation of
such facilities.
(4) The commission shall submit its final report, including recommendations, to the
Governor, the Legislature, and relevant state agencies no later than 12 months from the effective
date of this act.
(d) Expiration of Moratorium- The moratorium shall remain in effect for 18 months or
until the Legislature enacts new regulations based on the commission's recommendations,
whichever occurs first.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 3